Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; HEALTH AWARENESS HUB PILOT PROJECT.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for a payment to the Organization for Liberians in Minnesota for a health awareness hub pilot project. The pilot project must seek to address health care education and the physical and mental wellness needs of elderly individuals within the African immigrant community by offering culturally relevant support, resources, and preventive care education from medical practitioners who have a similar background and by making appropriate referrals to culturally competent programs, supports, and medical care. Within six months of the conclusion of the pilot project, the Organization for Liberians in Minnesota must provide the commissioner with an evaluation of the project as determined by the commissioner. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end